Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4715
Venue.

Venue for any proceeding under the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act is in the county in this state where:

(1) The decedent was domiciled at the time of death; or

(2) The decedent's property was located at the time of death if the decedent was not domiciled in Nebraska at the time of death.

Laws 2024, LB83, § 15.